California statutes. Water Code
(3) If required by a remediation plan approved by the oversight agency, maintaining any structure, waste management unit, improvement, or other facility constructed, improved, or placed on the abandoned mined lands.

(4) Periodically monitoring and reporting as required by the oversight agency.

(5) (A) Determining if the remediation plan implemented by the remediating agency has been effective to provide a substantial improvement in water quality affected by abandoned mine waste.

(B) If the remediating agency determines that the remediation plan implemented by the agency is not effective, the remediating agency shall promptly report that determination to the oversight agency. If the remediating agency or the oversight agency determines that the remediation plan implemented by the remediating agency is not effective, the remediating agency shall submit a modified remediation plan to the oversight agency which includes a proposal to improve the plan to make it effective, or a proposal to cease remedial activities on the abandoned mined lands and return those lands, including the water quality on those lands, to a condition that approximates the quality that existed prior to commencing remedial activities. The remediating agency shall implement the modified remediation plan as approved by the oversight agency.

(6) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, except as provided in Chapter 5.5 (commencing with Section 13370), if the remediating agency implements or has implemented the approved remediation plan and any modifications to the plan approved by the oversight agency, the remediating agency, with regard to any discharge of abandoned mine waste that is the subject of the plan, shall not be required to achieve water quality objectives or to comply with other requirements of this division or other laws that are administered by the state board or the regional boards, and shall not be subject to any enforcement actions pursuant to state law based on actions taken to implement the approved remediation plan, except for violations involving gross negligence, including reckless, willful, or wanton misconduct, or intentional misconduct by the remediating agency.

(c) The responsibilities of a remediating agency that engages in surface mining operations, as defined in Section 2735 of the Public Resources Code, in conjunction with the remediation or reclamation of abandoned mine waste or that performs reclamation of a surface mining operation pursuant to Section 2773.1 or 2796 of the Public Resources Code, include performing the applicable requirements of Section 2207 of the Public Resources Code and the Surface Mining and Reclamation Act of 1975 (Chapter 9 (commencing with Section 2710) of Division 2 of the Public Resources Code). The State Mining and Geology Board may grant an exemption from the requirements of Section 2207 of the Public Resources Code or from the Surface Mining and Reclamation Act of 1975 to a remediating agency and its contractors solely for the purpose of removing abandoned mine waste in connection with the implementation of an approved remediation plan.

(History: Added by Stats. 1995, Ch. 878, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

13398.3.

The remediation plan to be submitted by a remediating agency to the oversight agency shall include all of the following:

(a) Identification of the remediating agency, and a certification that the remediating agency is a remediating agency as defined in this chapter.

(b) Identification of the abandoned mined lands that are the subject of the plan.

(c) Identification of the waters of the state, if any, that are affected by the abandoned mined lands.

(d) A description of the physical conditions at the abandoned mined lands that are causing or have caused adverse water quality impacts.

(e) A description of the practices, including system design and construction plans, and operation and maintenance plans, proposed to reduce, control, mitigate, or eliminate the adverse water quality impacts and a schedule for implementing those practices. If the plan is prepared for an existing remediation project, the remediation plan shall include a description of practices that have been implemented and the practices that are proposed to improve the existing project, if any.

(f) An analysis demonstrating that the implementation of the practices described in the plan have caused, or are expected to cause, a substantial improvement in water quality for the identified waters.

(g) A description of monitoring or other assessment activities to be undertaken to evaluate the success of the implemented practices during and after implementation, including an assessment of baseline conditions.

(h) A budget and identified funding to pay for the implementation of the plan.

(i) Remediation goals and objectives.

(j) Contingency plans.

(k) A description of the remediating agency’s legal right to enter and conduct remedial activities.

(l) The signature of an authorized representative of the remediating agency.

(m) Identification of the pollutants to be addressed by the plan.

(History: Added by Stats. 1995, Ch. 878, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

13398.5.

The oversight agency shall do all of the following:

(a) Comply with the requirements of the California Environmental Quality Act (Division 13 (commencing with Section 21000) of the Public Resources Code) in connection with the review of any remediation plan.

(b) Provide an opportunity for public review of, and comment with regard to, the remediation plan.

(c) Disapprove, approve, or modify and approve a remediation plan at a public meeting.

(History: Added by Stats. 1995, Ch. 878, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

13398.7.

(a) The oversight agency may approve the remediation plan if the oversight agency finds that there is substantial evidence in the record that the plan will substantially improve water quality affected by abandoned mine waste.

(b) The oversight agency may approve a remediation plan for a project that the remediating agency implemented prior to January 1, 1996, if that oversight agency finds that there is substantial evidence in the record that the project has substantially improved water quality adversely impacted by mining activities on the abandoned mined lands undertaken before the project was implemented.

(c) The remediating agency is not required to include in the remediation plan a plan to achieve water quality objectives, with regard to any discharge of abandoned mine waste that is the subject of the plan, to comply with other requirements of this division, except for Chapter 5.5 (commencing with Section 13370), or to comply with any other law that is administered by the state board or the regional boards, with regard to that discharge.

(d) The oversight agency may approve a modification of an approved remediation plan to permit additional time for completing the remediation project or to otherwise modify the plan, after an opportunity for public comment.

(e) If the oversight agency determines that a remediating agency is not implementing the approved remediation plan in substantial compliance with its terms, that oversight agency shall notify the remediating agency of its determination, including the specific causes for that determination.

(f) If the oversight agency determines that the specific causes for the determination are not adequately addressed pursuant to subdivision (e), or if a compliance plan is not submitted to, and approved by, the oversight agency within 180 days from the date of the notification pursuant to subdivision (e), the oversight agency may determine that the remediating agency is in violation of this chapter. A remediating agency that is in violation of this chapter is not protected by the limitations on responsibility for remediation of abandoned mined lands provided by this chapter and may be subject to any enforcement action authorized by law.

(History: Added by Stats. 1995, Ch. 878, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

13398.9.

(a) This chapter has no effect on the tort liability of a remediating agency for personal injury or wrongful death.

(b) This chapter has no effect on the liability of a remediating agency based upon activities other than those undertaken in connection with the implementation of an approved remediation plan.

(c) This chapter has no effect on the liability of a remediating agency if that agency, following implementation of an approved remediation plan, benefits from, or participates in, any mining operation, including exploration, associated with the abandoned mined lands subject to the approved remediation plan.

(d) For the purposes of this chapter, the remediation plan for the Penn Mine property located in Calaveras County shall, if a memorandum of understanding is entered into by the state and other appropriate parties, include the terms and conditions set forth in that memorandum of understanding.

(History: Added by Stats. 1995, Ch. 878, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 5.8. Minor Violations [13399. - 13399.3.]

13399.

(a) The Legislature hereby finds and declares that the purpose of this chapter is to establish an enforcement policy for violations of this division that the enforcement agency finds are minor when the danger they pose to, or the potential that they have for endangering, human health, safety, or welfare or the environment are taken into account.

(b) It is the intent of the Legislature in enacting this chapter to provide a more resource-efficient enforcement mechanism, faster compliance times, and the creation of a productive and cooperative working relationship between the state board, the regional boards, and the regulated community while maintaining protection of human health and safety and the environment.

(c) This chapter applies solely to the actions of the state board and the regional boards in administering this division and has no application to the administrative enforcement actions of other public agencies.

(d) The state board and each regional board shall implement this chapter by determining the types of violations of this division, or of the regulations, rules, standards, orders, permit conditions, or other requirements adopted pursuant to this division that the state board or the regional board finds are minor violations in accordance with subdivisions (e) and (f). The state board shall implement this chapter through adoption of regulations or state policy for water quality control pursuant to Article 3 (commencing with Section 13140) of Chapter 3.

(e) In determining the types of violations that are minor violations, the state board or regional board shall consider all of the following factors:

(1) The magnitude of the violation.

(2) The scope of the violation.

(3) The severity of the violation.

(4) The degree to which a violation puts human health, safety, or welfare or the environment into jeopardy.

(5) The degree to which a violation could contribute to the failure to accomplish an important goal or program objective as established by this division.

(6) The degree to which a violation may make it difficult to determine if the violator is in compliance with other requirements of this division.

(f) For purposes of this chapter, a minor violation of this division shall not include any of the following:

(1) Any knowing, willful, or intentional violation of this division.

(2) Any violation of this division that enables the violator to benefit economically from noncompliance, either by realizing reduced costs or by gaining a competitive advantage.

(3) Any violation that is a chronic violation or that is committed by a recalcitrant violator.

(g) In determining whether a violation is chronic or a violator is recalcitrant, for purposes of paragraph (3) of subdivision (f), the state board or regional board shall consider whether there is evidence indicating that the violator has engaged in a pattern of neglect or disregard with respect to the requirements of this division or the requirements adopted pursuant to this division.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 775, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

13399.1.

For purposes of this chapter, “notice to comply” means a written method of alleging a minor violation that is in compliance with all of the following requirements:

(a) The notice to comply is written in the course of conducting an inspection by an authorized representative of the state board or regional board. If testing is required by the state board or regional board to determine compliance, and the testing cannot be conducted during the course of the inspection, the representative of the state board or regional board shall have a reasonable period of time to conduct the required testing. If, after the test results are available, the representative of the state board or regional board determines that the issuance of a notice to comply is warranted, the representative shall immediately notify the facility owner or operator in writing.

(b) A copy of the notice to comply is presented to a person who is an owner, operator, employee, or representative of the facility being inspected at the time that the notice to comply is written. If offsite testing is required pursuant to subdivision (a), a copy of the notice to comply may be mailed to the owner or operator of the facility.

(c) The notice to comply clearly states the nature of the alleged minor violation, a means by which compliance with the requirement cited by the representative of the state board or regional board may be achieved, and a time limit in which to comply, which shall not exceed 30 days.

(d) The notice to comply shall contain the information specified in subdivision (h) of Section 13399.2 with regard to the possible reinspection of the facility.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 775, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

13399.2.

(a) An authorized representative of the state board or regional board, who, in the course of conducting an inspection, detects a minor violation shall issue a notice to comply before leaving the site at which the minor violation is alleged to have occurred if the authorized representative finds that a notice to comply is warranted.

(b) A person who receives a notice to comply pursuant to subdivision (a) shall have the period specified in the notice to comply from the date of receipt of the notice to comply in which to achieve compliance with the requirement cited on the notice to comply. Within five working days of achieving compliance, the person who received the notice to comply shall sign the notice to comply, and return it to the representative of the state board or regional board, stating that the person has complied with the notice to comply. A false statement that compliance has been achieved is a violation of this division pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 13268, Section 13385, or subdivision (e) of Section 13387.

(c) A single notice to comply shall be issued for all minor violations cited during the same inspection and the notice to comply shall separately list each cited minor violation and the manner in which each minor violation may be brought into compliance.

(d) A notice to comply shall not be issued for any minor violation that is corrected immediately in the presence of the inspector. Immediate compliance in that manner may be noted in the inspection report, but the person shall not be subject to any further action by the representative of the state board or regional board.

(e) Except as otherwise provided in subdivision (g), a notice to comply shall be the only means by which the representative of the state board or regional board shall cite a minor violation. The representative of the state board or regional board shall not take any other enforcement action specified in this division against a person who has received a notice to comply if the person is in compliance with this section.

(f) If a person who receives a notice to comply pursuant to subdivision (a) disagrees with one or more of the alleged violations cited in the notice to comply, the person shall give written notice of appeal to the state board or regional board.

(g) Notwithstanding any other provision of this section, if a person fails to comply with a notice to comply within the prescribed period, or if the state board or regional board determines that the circumstances surrounding a particular minor violation are such that immediate enforcement is warranted to prevent harm to the public health or safety or to the environment, the state board or regional board may take any needed enforcement action authorized by this division.

(h) A notice to comply issued to a person pursuant to this section shall contain a statement that the inspected facility may be subject to reinspection at any time. Nothing in this section shall be construed as preventing the reinspection of a facility to ensure compliance or to ensure that minor violations cited in a notice to comply have been corrected.

(i) Nothing in this section shall be construed as preventing the state board or regional board, on a case-by-case basis, from requiring a person subject to a notice to comply to submit reasonable and necessary documentation to support a claim of compliance by the person.

(j) Nothing in this section restricts the power of a city attorney, district attorney, county counsel, or the Attorney General to bring, in the name of the people of California, any criminal proceeding otherwise authorized by law. Furthermore, nothing in this section prevents the state board or regional board, or a representative of the state board or regional board, from cooperating with, or participating in, such a proceeding.

(k) Notwithstanding any other provision of this section, if the state board or regional board determines that the circumstances surrounding a particular minor violation are such that the assessment of a civil penalty pursuant to this division is warranted or required by federal law, in addition to issuance of a notice to comply, the state board or regional board shall assess a civil penalty in accordance with this division, if the state board or regional board makes written findings that set forth the basis for the determination of the state board or regional board.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 775, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

13399.3.

On or before January 1, 2000, the state board shall report to the Legislature on actions taken by the state board and the regional boards to implement this chapter and the results of that implementation. Each regional board shall provide the state board with the information that the state board requests to determine the degree to which the purposes described in subdivision (a) of Section 13399 have been achieved.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2000, Ch. 727, Sec. 6.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 5.9. The Storm Water Enforcement Act of 1998 [13399.25. - 13399.43.]

13399.25.

This chapter supplements, and does not supplant, other laws relating to the discharge of storm water.

(History: Added by Stats. 1998, Ch. 998, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

13399.27.

On or before December 31, the state board, after any necessary investigation, shall annually prepare, and make available to the public, a report that includes both of the following for the previous calendar year:

(a) A list of those persons that were notified of their duty to comply with applicable general storm water NPDES permits pursuant to Section 13399.30 and a description of the responses received to those notifications, including the filing of notices of intent to obtain coverage or notices of nonapplicability, returned mail and no response, appeals of filing or permitting requirements pursuant to this chapter, site inspections, enforcement actions taken, and penalties assessed therefor.

(b) A list of those dischargers identified pursuant to Section 13399.31 that, during the previous calendar year, failed to submit an annual report or construction certification required by a regional board, and any penalties assessed therefor.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 524, Sec. 4.   (AB 355)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

13399.30.

(a) (1) Each year the regional boards shall undertake reasonable efforts to identify dischargers of storm water that have not obtained coverage under an appropriate storm water NPDES permit.

(2) Any person, including a person subject to waste discharge requirements under Section 1342(p) of Title 33 of the United States Code, that discharges, proposes to discharge, or is suspected by a regional board or the state board of discharging storm water associated with industrial activity that has not obtained coverage under an appropriate storm water NPDES permit, shall submit to the regional board, within 30 days from the date on which a notice is sent by the regional board, the appropriate notice of intent to obtain coverage or a notice of nonapplicability that specifies the basis for not needing to obtain coverage under an NPDES permit.

(b) If a person to which a notice is sent pursuant to subdivision (a) fails to submit the appropriate notice of intent to obtain coverage or the required notice of nonapplicability to the regional board within 30 days from the date on which that notice is sent, the executive officer of the regional board shall send a second notice to that discharger.

(c) (1) If a person to which a notice is sent pursuant to subdivision (b) fails to submit the required notice of nonapplicability to the regional board within 60 days from the date on which the notice pursuant to subdivision (a) was sent, the regional board shall impose the penalties described in subdivision (b) of Section 13399.33.

(2) If a person to which a notice is sent pursuant to subdivision (b) fails to submit the required notice of intent to obtain coverage to the regional board within 60 days from the date on which the notice pursuant to subdivision (a) was sent, the regional board shall impose the penalties described in subdivision (a) of Section 13399.33.

(History: Added by Stats. 1998, Ch. 998, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

13399.31.

(a) Each year the regional board shall conduct a review of the annual reports and construction certifications submitted in accordance with the requirements of an applicable NPDES permit and Section 1342(p) of Title 33 of the United States Code and shall identify the dischargers that have failed to submit that annual report or construction certification required by the regional board.

(b) The regional board shall notify each discharger that is identified pursuant to subdivision (a) with regard to its noncompliance and the penalties therefor.

(c) If a discharger to which a notice is sent pursuant to subdivision (b) fails to submit the annual report or construction certification required by the regional board to the regional board within 30 days from the date on which that notice is sent, the executive officer of the regional board shall send a second notice to that discharger.

(d) If a discharger to which a notice is sent pursuant to subdivision (c) fails to submit the annual report or construction certification required by the regional board to the regional board within 60 days from the date on which the notice is sent pursuant to subdivision (b), the regional board shall impose the penalties described in subdivision (c) of Section 13399.33.

(History: Added by Stats. 1998, Ch. 998, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

13399.33.

Except as provided in Section 13399.35, the regional board shall do all of the following with regard to a discharger that is subject to the requirements prescribed in accordance with Section 1342(p) of Title 33 of the United States Code:

(a) (1) With regard to a discharger of storm water associated with industrial activity that fails to submit the required notice of intent to obtain coverage in accordance with Section 13399.30, impose civil liability administratively in an amount that is not less than five thousand dollars ($5,000) per year of noncompliance or fraction thereof, unless the regional board makes express findings setting forth the reasons for its failure to do so, based on the specific factors required to be considered pursuant to paragraph (2).

(2) In determining the amount of the penalty imposed under this section, the regional board shall consider the nature, circumstances, extent, and gravity of the violation, and, with respect to the violator, the ability to pay, any prior history of violations, the degree of culpability, economic benefits or savings resulting from the violation, and other matters as justice may require. These considerations shall be balanced against the need for the regulatory costs of environmental protection to be borne equally by dischargers throughout the state, and the need for predictability of enforcement when making business decisions.

(b) With regard to a person that fails to submit the required notice of nonapplicability in accordance with Section 13399.30, impose civil liability administratively in the amount of one thousand dollars ($1,000).

(c) With regard to a person that fails to submit an annual report or construction certification in accordance with Section 13399.31, impose civil liability administratively in an amount that is not less than one thousand dollars ($1,000).

(d) Recover from the persons described in subdivisions (a), (b), and (c) the costs incurred by the regional board with regard to those persons.

(e) It is an affirmative defense to the penalties imposed under this section for a person described in subdivision (a) or (b) to prove that he or she did not, in fact, receive the notices required under Section 13399.30 or 13399.31.

(History: Added by Stats. 1998, Ch. 998, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

13399.35.

(a) The regional board may allow a person to reduce the penalties described in subdivisions (a), (b), and (c) of Section 13399.33 by up to 50 percent by undertaking a supplemental environmental project in accordance with the enforcement policy of the state board and any applicable guidance document.

(b) For the purposes of this section, a “supplemental environmental project” means an environmentally beneficial project that a person agrees to undertake, with the approval of the regional board, which would not be undertaken in the absence of an enforcement action under Section 13399.33.

(History: Added by Stats. 1998, Ch. 998, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

13399.37.

(a) The money generated from the imposition of liability and cost recovery pursuant to Section 13399.33 shall be deposited, and separately accounted for, in the Waste Discharge Permit Fund.

(b) The money described in subdivision (a) shall be available, upon appropriation by the Legislature, to the regional boards from which the revenues were generated for the purpose of carrying out storm water programs under this division.

(History: Added by Stats. 1998, Ch. 998, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

13399.41.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law, appropriate state agencies, as requested by the executive director of the state board, shall provide the state board with the names, addresses, and standard industrial classifications or types of business facilities that are subject to storm water programs under this division. The information obtained pursuant to this section shall be used by the state board solely to regulate the discharge of storm water associated with industrial activity under this division. The state shall reimburse state agencies for all reasonable expenses incurred in connection with complying with this section.

(History: Added by Stats. 1998, Ch. 998, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

13399.43.

For the purposes of this chapter, “NPDES permit” means a permit issued under the national pollutant discharge elimination system program in accordance with the Clean Water Act (33 U.S.C.A. Sec. 1251 et seq.).

(History: Added by Stats. 1998, Ch. 998, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 6. State Financial Assistance [13400. - 13444.]



  ARTICLE 1. State Water Quality Control Fund [13400. - 13401.]

13400.

As used in this chapter, unless otherwise apparent from the context:

(a) “Facilities” means any of the following:

(1) Facilities for the collection, treatment, or export of waste when necessary to prevent water pollution.

(2) Facilities to recycle wastewater and to convey recycled water.

(3) Facilities or devices to conserve water.

(4) Any combination of the facilities described in paragraph (1), (2), or (3).

(b) “Fund” means the State Water Quality Control Fund.

(c) “Not-for-profit organization” means an organization operated on a not-for-profit basis, including, but not limited to, an association, cooperative, or private corporation that is a public water system, as defined in Section 116275 of the Health and Safety Code, that meets technical, managerial, and financial capacity criteria specified by the state board for public water systems, or that is subject to regulatory authority pursuant to this division.“Not-for-profit organization” includes only an organization that is either controlled by a local public body or bodies or has a broadly based ownership by, or membership of, people of the local community.

(d) “Public agency” means any city, county, city and county, district,
 or other political subdivision of the state.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2015, Ch. 673, Sec. 33.   (AB 1531)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

13401.

(a) The State Water Quality Control Fund is continued in existence. The following moneys in the fund are appropriated, without regard to fiscal years, for expenditure by the state board in making loans to public agencies in accordance with this chapter:

(1) The balance of the original moneys deposited in the fund.

(2) Any money repaid to the fund.

(3) Any remaining balance of the money in the fund deposited therein after the specific appropriations for loans to the South Tahoe Public Utility District, the North Tahoe Public Utility District, the Tahoe City Public Utility District, the Truckee Sanitary District, and to any other governmental entity in the areas served by such districts have been made.

(b) Notwithstanding subdivision (a), upon the order of the state board, the money in the State Water Quality Control Fund shall be transferred to the State Water Pollution Control Revolving Fund.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1993, Ch. 775, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Loans to Local Agencies [13410. - 13417.]

13410.

Applications for construction loans under this chapter shall include:

(a) A description of the proposed facilities.

(b) A statement of facts showing the necessity for the proposed facilities and showing that funds of the public agency are not available for financing such facilities and that the sale of revenue or general obligation bonds through private financial institutions is impossible or would impose an unreasonable burden on the public agency.

(c) A proposed plan for repaying the loan.

(d) Other information as required by the state board.

(History: Added by Stats. 1969, Ch. 482.)
-------------------------------------------

13411.

Upon a determination by the state board, after consultation with the State Department of Health, that (a) the facilities proposed by an applicant are necessary to the health or welfare of the inhabitants of the state, (b) that the proposed facilities meet the needs of the applicant, (c) that funds of the public agency are not available for financing such facilities and that the sale of revenue or general obligation bonds through private financial institutions is impossible or would impose an unreasonable burden on the public agency, (d) that the proposed plan for repayment is feasible, (e) in the case of facilities proposed under Section 13400(c)(1) that such facilities are necessary to prevent water pollution, (f) in the case of facilities proposed under Section 13400(c)(2) that such facilities will produce recycled water and that the public agency has adopted a feasible program for use thereof, and (g) in the case of facilities proposed under Section 13400(c)(3) that such facilities are a cost effective means of conserving water, the state board, subject to approval by the Director of Finance, may loan to the applicant such sum as it determines is not otherwise available to the public agency to construct the proposed facilities.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1995, Ch. 28, Sec. 23.   Effective January 1, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

13412.

No loan shall be made to a public agency unless it executes an agreement with the state board under which it agrees to repay the amount of the loan, with interest, within 25 years at 50 percent of the average interest rate paid by the state on general obligation bonds sold in the calendar year immediately preceding the year in which the loan agreement is executed.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1986, Ch. 978, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

13413.

It is the policy of this state that, in making construction loans under this article, the state board should give special consideration to facilities proposed to be constructed by public agencies in areas in which further construction of buildings has been halted by order of the State Department of Health or a local health department, or both, or notice has been given that such an order is being considered; provided, however, that the public agencies designated in this section shall otherwise comply with and meet all requirements of other provisions of this chapter.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1971, Ch. 1593.)
-------------------------------------------

13414.

All money received in repayment of loans under this chapter shall be paid to the State Treasurer and credited to the fund.

(History: Added by Stats. 1969, Ch. 482.)
-------------------------------------------

13415.

(a) Loans may be made by the state board to public agencies to pay not more than one-half of the cost of studies and investigations made by such public agencies in connection with waste water reclamation.

(b) Not more than a total of two hundred thousand dollars ($200,00) shall be loaned pursuant to this section in any fiscal year, and not more than fifty thousand dollars ($50,000) shall be loaned to any public agency in any fiscal year pursuant to this section. In the event that less than two million dollars ($2,000,000) is available in any fiscal year for loans under this article, then not more than 10 pecent of the available amount shall be available for loans for studies and investigations pursuant to this section.

(c) Applications for such loans shall be made in such form, and shall contain such information, as may be required by the state board.

(d) Such loans shall be repaid within a period not to exceed 10 years, with interest at a rate established in the manner provided in Section 13412.

(History: Added by Stats. 1969, Ch. 482.)
-------------------------------------------

13416.

Before a public agency may enter into a contract with the state board for a construction loan under this chapter, the public agency shall hold an election on the proposition of whether or not the public agency shall enter into the proposed contract and more than 50 percent of the votes cast at such election must be in favor of such proposition.

(History: Added by Stats. 1969, Ch. 482.)
-------------------------------------------

13417.

The election shall be held in accordance with the following provisions:

(a) The procedure for holding an election on the incurring of bonded indebtedness by the public agency shall be utilized for an election of the proposed contract as nearly as the same may be applicable. Where the law applicable to the public agency does not contain a bond election procedure, the procedure set forth in the Revenue Bond Law of 1941 (Chapter 6 (commencing with Section 54300) of Part 1 of Division 2 of Title 5 of the Government Code), as it may now or hereafter be amended, shall be utilized as nearly as the same may be applicable.

(b) No
 particular form of ballot is required.

(c) The notice of the election shall include a statement of the time and place of the election, the purpose of the election, the general purpose of the contract, and the maximum amount of money to be borrowed from the state under the contract.

(d) The ballots for the election shall contain a brief statement of the general purpose of the contract substantially as stated in the notice of the election and shall state the maximum amount of money to be borrowed from the state under the contract. To the right of or below the statement of the proposition to be voted on, the
 words “Yes” and “No” shall be printed on separate lines, with voting targets.

(e) The election shall be held in the entire public agency except where the public agency proposes to contract with the state board on behalf of a specified portion, or of specified portions of the public agency, in which case the election shall be held in the applicable portion or portions of the public agency only.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 303, Sec. 37.   (AB 1512)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2.5. Guarantees for Local Agency Bonds [13425. - 13433.]

13425.

Applications for guarantees for local agency bonds under this chapter shall include:

(a) A description of the proposed facilities.

(b) A financing plan for the proposed facilities, including the amount of debt and maximum term to maturity of the proposed local agency bond issue and identification of sources of revenue that will be dedicated to payment of principal and interest on the bonds.

(c) Other information as required by the state board.

The state board may provide that the application may be combined with applications for any other source of funds administered by the state board.

(History: Added by Stats. 1988, Ch. 47, Sec. 1.   Effective March 18, 1988.)
-------------------------------------------

13426.

The state board, subject to approval by the Director of Finance, may agree to provide a guarantee pursuant to this article for all or a specified part of the proposed local agency bond issue upon making all of the following determinations:

(a) The facilities proposed by an applicant are necessary to the health or welfare of the inhabitants of the state and are consistent with water quality control plans adopted by regional boards.

(b) The proposed facilities meet the needs of the applicant.

(c) The proposed bond issue and plan repayment are sound and feasible.
